Washington statutes.
RCW 6.26.025

Writs of garnishment to different garnishees.

If issuance of a writ of garnishment or of a writ of attachment has been ordered by the court in a case, other writs of garnishment to different garnishees may be issued in the same case under the circumstances and restrictions stated in RCW 6.25.120 for issuance of successive writs of attachment.

[ 1988 c 231 s 21.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.